apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а.
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<R_ZEQ%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<R_ZEQ%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<R_ZEQ%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>%<N1%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<R_ZEQ%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<R_ZEQ%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<R_ZEQ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<R_ZEQ%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<R_ZEQ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<R_ZEQ%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<R_ZEQ%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND

%<R_ZEQ%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-ORG-ABBR             ! for abbreviations like FIFA
%<R_ZEQ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<R_ZEQ%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -

LEXICON NP-AL

%<R_ZEQ%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-AL-ABBR              ! for abbreviations like ӘЧ - Әлем Чемпионаты
%<R_ZEQ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<R_ZEQ%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<R_ZEQ%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<R_SN%>: # ;
%<R_SN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<R_SN%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<R_SN%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<R_SN%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<R_SN%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<R_SN%>: # ;
%<R_SN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<R_SN%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<R_SN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<R_SN%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<R_SN%>: # ;

LEXICON LTR

%<ltr%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<R_SH%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<R_SH%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{G%}%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV

%<R_US%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<R_US%>: KI ;
%<R_US%>%<C6%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ; ! FIXME: overgenerates a bit

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used for бері<adv>/бергі<adv><attr> 'right now' and similar

:%{I%} ADV ;
%<R_US%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<R_US%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CC

%<R_ZHL%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CS

%<R_ZHL%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<R_ZHL%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON QST

%<R_SH%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<R_SH%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

! шығар, сияқты etc.

%<R_MOD%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<R_OS%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<R_ELK%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON PAREN

%<paren%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

ма:%~ма QST ; ! Dir/RL 
ма:ма QST ; ! Dir/LR 
ғой:%~ғой QST ; ! Dir/RL 
ғой:қой QST ; ! Dir/LR 


!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!


ма:%~ма QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ма:ма QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ба QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:па QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ме QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:бе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:пе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма% не:%~ма% не QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ма% не:ма% не QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма% не:ме% не QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ше:ше QST ; ! ""

ғой:%~ғой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/RL
ғой:ғой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR
ғой:қой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR

шығар:шығар MOD ; ! FIXME actually a verb, takes personal suffixes (V-PERS-S1);
                  !   ... more like <vaux><pres> than like a full verb -JNW
                  ! requires some transfer rules as e.g. in the following:
                  !# (kaz) Олар мүмкiн көп кiтап оқыған шығар.
                  !# (tat) Алар бәлки күп китап укыганнардыр.
                  !# (kir) Алар мүмкүн көп китеп окугандыр.


!===================!
 LEXICON Postadverbs
!===================!


%-ақ:%-ақ POSTADV ; ! ""

ғана:%~ғана POSTADV ; ! Dir/RL
ғана:ғана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR
ғана:қана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR

да:%~да POSTADV ; ! "1. even if"     Dir/RL
да:да POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:де POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:та POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR

тағы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too" ! FIXME:CHECK pos
тегіс POSTADV ; ! "entirely/all/all together"


!================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!================!

PRON-PERS ;

DemonstrativePronouns ;

InterrogativePronouns ;

әлдеқандай:әлдеқандай PRON-IND ; ! ""
әрбіреу:әрбіреу PRON-QNT ; ! ""
басқалар:басқалар PRON-IND-PL ; ! "other" !to fix
басқа:басқа PRON-IND ; ! "other" ! to fix
бірдеме:бірдеме PRON-IND ; ! "something"
бірдеңе:бірдеңе PRON-IND ; ! "something"
бір% нәрсе:бір% нәрсе PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
қайда% болса% сонда:қайда% болса% сонда PRON-IND ; ! "anywhere" Use/MT
кей:кей PRON-IND ; ! "some" FIXME CHECK determiner?
кейбір:кейбір PRON-IND ; ! "some"
қай:қай PRON-IND ; ! "which"
әр:әр PRON-IND ; ! !"either" Use/MT
біреу:біреу PRON-IND ; ! !"someone" Use/MT

әрқайсысы:әрқайсы PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "each of"
қай%-қайсысы:қай%-қайсысы PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "any of; each of"
барлық:барлық PRON-QNT ; ! ""
бәрі:бәр PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "everyone"
! бәрі PRON-IND ; ! "everyone"  !!! This is an alternate of below ! FIXME: true for Kazakh too?
біреу:біреу PRON-QNT ; ! ""
екеу:екеу PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "both" !Use/MT
әркім:әркім PRON-QNT ; ! ""
көбі:көп PRON-QNT-POSS  ; ! "most" !Use/MT
бірқатар:бірқатар PRON-QNT ; !
кейбіреу:кейбіреу PRON-QNT ; !
түгел:түгел PRON-QNT ; ! "all"



ешкім:ешкім PRNNEG ; ! "no one"
ешнәрсе:ешнәрсе PRNNEG ; ! "nothing"
ешнәрсе:еш% нәрсе PRNNEG ; ! "nothing" ! Dir/LR
ештеңе:ештеңе PRNNEG ; ! "nothing"
ешбір:ешбір PRNNEG ; ! "not one"


бір%-бірі:бір%-бір PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"

өз:өз PRON-REF ; ! "self"



!==================!
 LEXICON Ideophones
!==================!

арс:арс IDEO ; ! ""
жарқ:жарқ IDEO ; ! ""

!===================!
 LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!


%.%<R_NKT%>:%. # ;
%.%.%.%<R_NKT%>:%.%.%. # ;
%;%<R_UNKT%>:%; # ;
%:%<R_QNKT%>:%: # ;
%!%<R_LEP%>:%! # ;
%-%<R_DPH%>:%- # ;
%-%<R_DPH%>:%- # ;
%—%<R_DPH%>:%— # ;
%–%<R_DPH%>:%– # ;
,%<R_UTR%>:%, # ;
%?%<R_SUR%>:%? # ;
%'%<R_APS%>:%' # ;
%"%<R_TRN%>:%" # ;
%«%<R_ATRN%>:%« # ;
%»%<R_ZTRN%>:%» # ;
%”%<R_ZTRN%>:%” # ;
%“%<R_ATRN%>:%“ # ;
%(%<R_AZZ%>:%( # ;
%]%<R_ZZZ%>:%] # ;
%[%<R_AZZ%>:%[ # ;
%)%<R_ZZZ%>:%) # ;
%\%<R_BSLH%>:%\ # ;
%/%<R_SLH%>:%/ # ;


!==============!
 LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
!==============!


%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

!LEXICON Guesser
!
!<(а | ә | б | в | г | ғ | д | е | ё | ж | з | и | і | й | к | қ | л | м | н | ң | о | ө | п | р | с | т | у | ұ | ү | ф | х | һ | ц | ч | ш | щ | ь | ы | ъ | э | ю | я)+> N1 ;

LEXICON NP-UNK

%<R_ZEQ%>%<R_X%>: # ;

LEXICON GUESS-QUEUE

<(a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v | w | x | y | z)+> NP-UNK ;

LEXICON Parentheses

шынына% келсек:шынына% келсек PAREN ; ! "telling the truth"
өкінішке% орай:өкінішке% орай PAREN ; ! "unfortunately"
сонымен:сонымен PAREN ; ! "so"

 LEXICON Conjunctions
да:те CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
не:не CC ; ! "neither... , nor ... (x2)" ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig
әрі:әрі CC ; ! "and (x2)" FIXME:DISAMBIG: from "әрі<adv>" (as adverb it is not repeated)
яки:яки CC ; ! "or"
бірақ:бірақ CC ; ! "but"
я:я CC ; ! "or"
қашан% да:қашан% да CS ; ! "if"
ондай% болса:ондай% болса CS ; ! "in that case"
яғни:яғни CS ; ! "that is, то есть"
өйткені:өйткені CS ; ! "because"
басқаша% айтканда:басқаша% айтканда CA ; ! ""
мәлімдеуінше:мәлімдеуінше CA ; ! ""
себебі:себебі CA ; ! ""
сөздерінше:сөздерінше CA ; ! ""
мәліметінше:мәліметінше CA ; ! ""
 LEXICON Postpositions
қарамағындағы:қарамағындағы POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
сайын:сайын POST ; ! "every" + NOM
қарағанда:қарағанда POST ; ! "according to; than(?)" + DAT
басқа:басқа POST ; ! "besides, except" + ABL          ! FIXME disambiguate бас<n><dat>
тарта:тарта POST ;
 LEXICON Numerals
төрт:төрт NUM ; ! "four"
сегіз:сегіз NUM ; ! "eight"
он% алты:он% алты NUM ; ! "sixteen"
жиырма:жиырма NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
алпыс:алпыс NUM ; ! "sixty"
бес% жүз:бес% жүз NUM ; ! "fivehundred"
миллиард:миллиард NUM ; ! "billion"
екеу:екеу NUM-COLL ;
үшеу:үшеу NUM-COLL ;
төртеу:төртеу NUM-COLL ;
бесеу:бесеу NUM-COLL ;
алтау:алтау NUM-COLL ;
жетеу:жетеу NUM-COLL ;
неше:неше NUM-ITG ;
қанша:қанша NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Михайлович:Михайло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Тимофеевич:Тимофее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Анатольевич:Анатолье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Вуянович:Вуяно NP-PAT-VICH ; ! "" ! Use/MT
Гашпорович:Гашпоро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! "" ! Use/MT
Ақышев:Ақышев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Боқаев:Боқаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Брагин:Брагин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Жанұзақов:Жанұзақов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Калинин:Калинин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ксенофонтов:Ксенофонтов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Левин:Левин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Мухин:Мухин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Мушкетов:Мушкетов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Савин:Савин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Савуков:Савуков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тәжін:Тәжін NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Consolidated% Contractors% Company:Consolidated% Contractors% Company NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Atari:Atari NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
ABC:ABC NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Karachaganak% Petroleum% Operating:Karachaganak% Petroleum% Operating NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Plc:Plc NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Аджанта:Аджанта NP-ORG ; !"Use/MT"
Боруссия% Дортмунд:Боруссия% Дортмунд%{☭%} NP-ORG ; ! "Borussia Dortmund"
БТА:БТА NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "a bank in Kazakhstan"
ҚМЭБИ:ҚМЭБИ NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "KIMEP"
КИМЭП:КИМЭП NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "KIMEP"
Гардиан:Гардиан NP-ORG ; ! ""
ЖСДП:ЖСДП NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "Жалпыұлттық социал демократиялық партия=Гомуммилли Социаль Демократик Партия=International Social Democratic Party"
КАФ:КАФ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
Қазмырыш:Қазмырыш NP-ORG ; ! ""
КОНМЕБОЛ:КОНМЕБОЛ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
НАТО:НАТО NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! ""
Рейтер:Рейтер NP-ORG ; ! ""
Түрік% Әуежолдары:Түрік% Әуежолдар NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Turkish Airways"
ФИФА:ФИФА NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! ""
Чемпиондар% лигасы:Чемпиондар% лига NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "UEFA Champions League"
Шеврон:Шеврон NP-ORG ; ! ""
Halal:Halal NP-AL ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NP-AL ; ! ""
Артемида:Артемида NP-AL ; ! ""
Ил:Ил NP-AL ; ! ""
Омичъ:Омичъ NP-AL ; ! ""
Фунтик:Фунтик NP-AL ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
қалай:қалай ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
қашан:қашан ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
неғұрлым:неғұрлым ADV-ITG ; ! ""
қаншалықты:қаншалықты ADV-ITG ; ! ""
артында:артында ADV ; ! "behind"    !Use/MT
өте% жақсы:өте% жақсы ADV ; ! "efficiently"
ең% жақын:ең% жақын ADV ; !
бүгін:бүгін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today > today's"   FIXME: takes abl, dat, ...
былтыр:былтыр ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year > last year's"
кәзір:кәзір ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "now > the one now (dial.)"
кеш:кеш ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "evening/late"
таңертең:таңертең ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "morning"
бері:бер ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "on the near side"
жоғары:жоғар ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "high"
ақыры:ақыр ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "at last, finally / the last __"
жұрт% алдында:жұрт% алдында ADV ; !"Use/MT"
әлеуметтік:әлеуметтік ADV ; !"Use/MT"
үш% рет:үш% рет ADV ; !"Use/MT"
 LEXICON Interjections
әйе:әйе INTERJ ; ! "yes"
ох:ох INTERJ ; ! ""
ей:ей INTERJ ; ! ""
мақұл:мақұл INTERJ ; ! "fine/okay"
сәлем:сәлем INTERJ ; ! ""
 LEXICON Abbreviations
KPO:KPO ABBR ; ! ""
авг%.:авг%. ABBR ;
ӘЧ:ӘЧ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
ІІМ:ІІМ ABBR ; ! "Ішке істер министрліғі"
сент%.:сент%. ABBR ;
СПБМУ:СПБМУ ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Guesser
E:E GUESS-QUEUE ;
J:J GUESS-QUEUE ;
N:N GUESS-QUEUE ;
R:R GUESS-QUEUE ;
Z:Z GUESS-QUEUE ;
сол% себепті:сол% себепті CS ; ! ""
LEXICON Common ! <- future
неғып:неғып ADV-ITG ; ! ""
   ъ | э | ю | я )> LTR ;
